normalizer.xfst
#############################
#
# This normalizer will remove the metadata from an online
# news article and it will convert it into plain text,
# by taking the text from the news in the <p> tags.
# It has been tested on various online newspapers, such as
# times of Malta (timesofmalta.com) and Naiz (naiz.eus).
#
#############################

clear stack;

define SP " ";

define OP "<";

define CP ">";

#Rule to delete everything outside of the tags
define rule2 ~${</p>} {<p>} @-> {<p>} .o. {</p>} ~${<p>} @-> {</p>};
 
read regex rule2;

apply down < gara.txt > input.marked;


#a python code that removes the duplicated lines that "apply down" creates.
system ./removeDuplicateLine.py input.marked 2

#rule to delete the end of the hyperlinks
define HYPERRULE1 "</a>" -> 0;

#another rule for the beginning of the hyperlinks
define HYPERRULE2 OP a ?* CP @-> 0;

#rule to delete the beginning of quotes
define QUOTERULE1 "&laquo;" -> 0;

#rule to delete the ending of the quotes
define QUOTERULE2 "&raquo;" -> 0;

#rule to remove backslash from the text
define BACKSLASHRULE %\ -> 0 || ?* _ ?*;

#Rule to discard everything but the lines starting with <p> and ending with </p> 
define INOUTRULE ?* @-> 0 || .#. \"<p>" _ \"</p>" .#. ;

#Rule to remove tags
define TAGRULE "<p>" @-> 0 .o. "</p>" @-> 0;

#Rule to remove "greater than" and "smaller than" symbols
define GREATSMALL %> -> 0 .o. %< -> 0; 

#Rule to remove pictures, in case there are
define PICRULE {img} SP {src} ?* @-> 0; 

#Rule to convert uppercase letters into lowercase letters
define UPPER2LOWER A -> a, B -> b, C -> c, D -> d, E -> e, F -> f, G -> g, H -> h, I -> i, J -> j, K -> k, L -> l, M -> m, N -> n, O -> o, P -> p, Q -> q, R -> r, S -> s, T -> t, U -> u, V -> v, W -> w, X -> x, Y -> y, Z -> z;

#Rule to remove all lines with 2 characters
define CAC2 ? ? -> 0 || .#. _ .#.;

#Rule to remove all lines with 1 character
define CAC1 ? -> 0 || .#. _ .#.;

clear stack;

read regex HYPERRULE1 .o. HYPERRULE2 .o. BACKSLASHRULE .o. UPPER2LOWER .o. QUOTERULE1 .o. QUOTERULE2 .o. INOUTRULE .o. TAGRULE .o. GREATSMALL .o. PICRULE .o. CAC2 .o. CAC1;


apply down < input.marked.rdl > input.filt;

system ./removeDuplicateLine.py input.filt

system mv input.filt.rdl input.norm
